Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the  Bureau of Labor and Industries, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $26,129,990.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$7,642,976 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Bureau of Labor
and Industries.
SECTION 3. (1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the amount of
$10,331,547 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of administrative expenses by  the Bureau of Labor and Industries from the Wage
Security Fund.
(2) For the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, expenditures by the Bureau of Labor and
Industries for wage claim payments from the Wage Security Fund are not limited.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,042,922 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Bureau of Labor and
Industries.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $297,187
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from  the Veterans’ Services Fund established
under ORS 406.140  to the Bureau of Labor and Industries for the purpose of implementing
the provisions of ORS 660.220.
SECTION 6.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5515 (SB 5515-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5515 (SB 5515-A) Page 2